Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 3. Benefits

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Unemployment Compensation §§ 104 to 163.

47B C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 579 to 584; 81 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare §§ 140 to 174.

§ 27-3-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Additional benefits” means benefits payable under state law to exhaustees due to high unemployment conditions or other special factors and totally financed by any state;

“Applicable benefit year” means an individual’s most recent benefit year or an individual’s current benefit year if at the time of filing a claim for extended benefits his benefit year is unexpired only in the state in which filing;

“Eligibility period” means those weeks in an individual’s benefit year beginning in an extended benefit period and if his benefit year ends within the extended benefit period, any weeks beginning in this period;

“Extended benefits” means benefits payable to an individual under this article for weeks of unemployment in his eligibility period including benefits payable to federal employees and veterans under 5 U.S.C. § 8501 et seq.;

“Most recent benefit year” means the benefit year with the latest ending date for individuals filing a claim for extended benefits with unexpired benefit years in more than one (1) state or, if the benefit years have the same ending date, the benefit year in which the latest continued claim for regular benefits was filed;

“Regular benefits” means benefits, excluding extended and additional benefits, payable to an individual under this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] or any other state law including dependent’s allowances and benefits payable to federal employees or veterans under 5 U.S.C. § 8501 et seq.;

“State law” means the unemployment insurance law of any state approved by the United States secretary of labor under 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 27-3-302.
Payment; liability.

Benefits provided by this article are payable from the unemployment compensation fund established by W.S.

27-3-201

. All benefits shall be paid through department offices in accordance with regulations of the commission.

The department is liable for benefit payments only to the extent provided by this act and to the extent that funds are available within the fund.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 3, 21; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-103, 54-120; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-24, 27-41; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

27-3-103

, 27-3-121; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Constitutionality. —

The Unemployment Compensation Act, in taking money of employer and giving it to persons who have never been in his employ, serves a public purpose for welfare of all and does not violate art. 1, §§ 32 and 33, Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Nature of benefits. —

Unemployment benefits do not constitute a gratuity but are a part of compensation or wages. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Vested right of applicant for unemployment compensation in mode and manner of computing benefits in effect at time of his discharge or loss of employment, 20 ALR2d 963.

Unemployment compensation as affected by vacation or payment in lieu thereof, 14 ALR4th 1175.

Offsetting unemployment benefits received against award for backpay in employment discrimination actions, 66 ALR Fed 880.

§ 27-3-303.
Weekly amount; computation; payment.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the weekly benefit amount for an eligible individual is four percent (4%) of his total wages payable for insured work in that quarter of his base period in which his wages were highest computed to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00). The amount shall not be more than the statewide weekly wage multiplied by fifty-five percent (55%) and computed to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00). The statewide weekly wage is the total wages reported by employers, excluding the limitation on the amount of wages subject to contributions under this act, for employment during the calendar year preceding June 1 divided by the product of fifty-two (52) times the twelve (12) month average of the number of employees in the pay period and rounded to the nearest cent. The statewide average annual wage is the total wages reported by employers, excluding the limitation on the amount of wages subject to contributions under this act, for employment during the calendar year preceding June 1 divided by the twelve (12) month average of the number of employees in the pay period and rounded to the nearest cent. The pay period reported by employers shall include the twelfth day of each month during the same year. The minimum and maximum weekly benefit paid under this subsection to any individual applies only to the benefit year beginning on or after July 1.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 175, § 3.

An eligible individual unemployed in any week shall be paid his weekly benefit for that week less any earnings payable to him for that week which exceeds fifty percent (50%) of his weekly benefit amount. The reported earnings and resulting payment shall be computed to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00).

Effective April 1, 1984, and any other time thereafter, when the revenues in the fund excluding legislative appropriations and interfund borrowing are certified by the governor to be inadequate to pay the benefits computed as provided in subsection (a) of this section and inadequate to repay interfund or federal loans, the weekly benefit of any individual whose benefits computed under subsection (a) of this section would equal or exceed ninety dollars ($90.00) per week shall be reduced to eighty-five percent (85%) of that computed under subsection (a) of this section rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00). No individual receiving benefits of ninety dollars ($90.00) or more per week shall receive less than ninety dollars ($90.00) per week because of the reduction provided under this subsection. The reduced benefits shall continue until the governor and the state treasurer certify to the department that the fund is adequately solvent to pay the benefits computed under subsection (a) of this section. A reduction in an individual’s weekly benefit amount resulting from the imposition of this provision will not increase the number of full weeks of benefits to which the individual would otherwise have been entitled had the provision not been invoked. The amounts paid under this subsection shall be in complete satisfaction of a claimant’s rights and benefits under this act.

Upon periodic certification by the governor to the state treasurer of inadequate revenues, the state treasurer may authorize interfund loans from the legislative stabilization reserve account for cumulative amounts not exceeding twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00), to the unemployment compensation fund as needed to repay revenues borrowed pursuant to W.S.

27-3-208

or to pay benefits through January 1, 1995, which are not able to be paid due to the insufficiency of any available revenues except for those obtained through W.S.

27-3-208

. Loans pursuant to this subsection shall bear interest at the interest rate earned on pooled fund investments in the previous fiscal year and shall be repaid when the unemployment compensation fund is adequately solvent to repay the loans and to continue paying the benefit obligations.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 2, 3; 1939, ch. 121, § 1; ch. 124, §§ 1 to 8; 1941, ch. 96, §§ 2, 3; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 1 to 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 1 to 4; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-102, 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 1 to 3; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 1, 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-23, 27-24; Laws 1959, ch. 105, § 1; 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1967, ch. 3, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 216, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 60, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, §§ 1, 2; ch. 253, §§ 2 to 8, 14; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

27-3-102

,

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1985, ch. 175, §§ 1, 3; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1988, ch. 51, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83 § 1; 1993, ch. 19, § 1; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; 2018 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (e), substituted “loans from the
legislative stabilization reserve account for cumulative” for
“loans from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund or any
other available permanent fund not subject to interest earning trust
obligations, for cumulative” in the first sentence and “shall
bear interest at the interest rate earned on pooled fund investments
in the previous fiscal year and shall” for “shall bear
no interest and shall” in the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 4 reads: “The legislature reserves the right to amend, modify or repeal all or any part of the Wyoming Employment Security Law at any time. There is no vested private right of any kind under that act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Applied

in

Scott v. Fagan, 684 P.2d 805,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1984).

§ 27-3-304.
Maximum payment.

Except as provided by W.S.

27-3-316

, the maximum amount of benefits payable to any eligible individual in a benefit year shall not exceed twenty-six (26) times his weekly benefit or thirty percent (30%) of his wages payable for insured work in his base period, whichever is less. This amount shall be computed to the next higher multiple of his weekly benefit.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

§ 27-3-305.
Disclosure of child support obligations required; notification; amount withheld; payment; applicability of provisions.

An individual filing a new claim for benefits payable under this act shall disclose if he owes child support obligations enforced pursuant to a plan described in 42 U.S.C. § 654 and approved under 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq. If the individual owes child support obligations and is eligible for benefits, the department shall notify the state or local child support enforcement agency operating pursuant to a plan described in 42 U.S.C. § 654 and enforcing the obligation that the individual is eligible for benefits.

The department shall withhold from benefits payable to an individual owing child support obligations enforced pursuant to a plan approved under 42 U.S.C. § 651, et seq.:

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

The amount determined pursuant to an agreement under 42 U.S.C. § 654(19)(B)(i) and submitted to the department by the state or local child support enforcement agency.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

Any amount withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid by the department to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency, treated as if paid to the individual as benefits under this act and as if paid by the individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of his child support obligations.

This section applies only if arrangements are made for reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement agency for administrative costs incurred by the department attributable to child support obligations enforced by the agency and if the obligations are being enforced pursuant to a plan approved under 42 U.S.C. § 651, et seq.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 19, § 1; 2005, ch. 186, §§ 2, 3.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (b)(i) and (b)(iii), allowing the department to withhold the amount specified by the individual and any amount otherwise required to be withheld from benefits payable under this act pursuant to legal process from benefits payable to an individual owing child support, and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 27-3-306.
Eligibility requirements; waiver or amendment authorized; unemployed waiting period; registration and referral for suitable work.

An unemployed individual is eligible for benefits under this article for any week if he:

Registers for work with the department of workforce services and actively seeks work in accordance with regulations of the commission, unless he will be recalled to full-time work:

By an employer who paid fifty percent (50%) or more of his base period wages;

Within twelve (12) weeks by an employer.

Files a benefit claim for that week in accordance with regulations of the commission;

Is able and available for work;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

Earned wages for insured work in amounts specified by subsection (d) of this section;

As a corporate officer, is unemployed, certifies unemployment and otherwise satisfies the requirements of this subsection;

Continues to report to a department office in accordance with regulations of the commission; and

Participates in reemployment services such as job search assistance services if the individual is determined to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and to require reemployment services pursuant to a profiling system established by the department, unless the department determines:

The individual has completed reemployment services; or

There is justifiable cause for the claimant’s failure to participate in these services.

The commission may by regulation waive or amend the requirements of this section for individuals attached to regular work or other situations in which these requirements are inconsistent with this act. Regulations of the commission shall not conflict with W.S.

27-3-303

.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

To qualify under paragraph (a)(v) of this section, an individual shall have earned:

Wages for insured work during his base period of not less than eight percent (8%) of the statewide average annual wage computed under W.S. 27-3-303(a) rounded to the lowest fifty dollars ($50.00);

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 19, § 2.

Wages for insured work of one and four-tenths (1.4) times the high quarter earnings in his base period; and

Not less than eight (8) times the weekly benefit amount of his current claim for services after the beginning of the next preceding benefit year in which benefits were received. This paragraph applies only if the base period is the first four (4) of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of the benefit year. Services under this paragraph must be performed in an employer-employee relationship but are not required to qualify as employment under W.S.

27-3-104

through

27-3-108

.

The department of workforce services shall register and refer eligible benefit claimants under this article to suitable work meeting criteria prescribed by W.S.

27-3-312

for regular benefits and by W.S. 27-3-317(e) for extended benefits.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 3, 4; 1939, ch. 124, §§ 8, 9; 1941, ch. 96, §§ 3, 4; 1943, ch. 58, §§ 3, 4; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3 to 5; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-103, 54-104; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 3, 4; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 2, 3; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-24, 27-25; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 4; 1967, ch. 175, § 1; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 11, 12, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

27-3-103

,

27-3-104

; Laws 1980, ch. 24, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1987, ch. 98, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1992, ch. 18, § 1; 1993, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 13, § 1; 1996, ch. 66, § 1; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 74, § 1; ch. 100, § 3; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; 2005, ch. 186, § 3.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (a)(iv), pertaining to eligibility of an individual unemployed for a waiting period of one week, and repealed former (c), clarifying eligibility under (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 161, § 2 provides: “The department of employment, unemployment insurance division, shall maintain records regarding the number of individuals claiming and awarded benefits and the amount of benefits awarded to individuals under W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i)(D), created by section 1 of this act.
Not later than December 31, 2010 and not later than each December 31 of each year thereafter that benefits are provided under W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i)(D), the department shall submit a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, detailing the number of claimants and amounts awarded pursuant to W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i)(D).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of the term “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 27-3-102(a)(xxii).

Cited

in

Bettcher v. Wyoming Dep't of Emp., 884 P.2d 635,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1994); Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Outside piece workers as within unemployment compensation act, 1 ALR2d 555.

Taxicab driver as employee of owner of cab, or independent contractor, within social security and unemployment insurance statutes, 10 ALR2d 369.

Leaving employment, or unavailability for particular job or duties, because of sickness or disability, as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 14 ALR2d 1308.

Right to unemployment compensation of claimant who refuses nonunion employment, 56 ALR2d 1015.

Right to unemployment compensation or social security benefits of one working on his own projects or activities, 65 ALR2d 1182.

Severance payments as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 93 ALR2d 1319.

Failure or delay with respect to filing or reporting requirements as ground for denial of unemployment compensation benefits, 97 ALR2d 752.

Eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to work at particular times or on particular shifts, 35 ALR3d 1129, 12 ALR4th 611.

Eligibility of employee laid off according to employer's mandatory retirement plan, 50 ALR3d 880.

Termination of employment because of pregnancy as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 51 ALR3d 254.

Alien's right to unemployment compensation benefits, 87 ALR3d 694.

Eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to comply with requirements as to dress, grooming, or hygiene, 88 ALR3d 150.

Eligibility as affected by claimant's insistence upon conditions not common or customary to particular employment, 88 ALR3d 1353.

Unemployment compensation: eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to accept employment at compensation less than that of previous job, 94 ALR3d 63.

Eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to work at reduced compensation, 95 ALR3d 449.

Part-time or intermittent workers as covered by or as eligible for benefits under state unemployment compensation act, 95 ALR3d 891.

Eligibility as affected by mental, nervous, or psychological disorder, 1 ALR4th 802.

Unemployment compensation: trucker as employee or independent contractor, 2 ALR4th 1219.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by claimant's receipt of holiday pay, 3 ALR4th 557.

Unemployment compensation as affected by vacation or payment in lieu thereof, 14 ALR4th 1175.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by employee's refusal to work in areas where smoking is permitted, 14 ALR4th 1234.

Unemployment compensation: eligibility where claimant leaves employment under circumstances interpreted as a firing by the claimant but as a voluntary quit by the employer, 80 ALR4th 7.

Private employee's loss of employment because of refusal to submit to drug test as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 86 ALR4th 309.

Unemployment compensation: Eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to work at particular times or on particular shifts for domestic or family reasons 2 ALR5th 475.

Unemployment compensation claimant's eligibility as affected by loss of, or failure to obtain, license, certificate or similar qualification for continued employment, 15 ALR5th 653.

Employee's control or ownership of corporation as precluding receipt of benefits under state unemployment compensation provisions, 23 ALR5th 176.

Eligibility for unemployment compensation as affected by claimant's voluntary separation or refusal to work alleging that the work is illegal or immoral, 41 ALR5th 123.

Leaving employment or unavailability for particular job or duties because of sickness or disability, as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 68 ALR5th 13.

Eligibility for unemployment compensation of employee who retires voluntarily, 75 ALR5th 339.

Determination of employer-employee relationship for social security contribution and unemployment tax purposes under § 3121(d)(2) of federal Insurance Contributions Act (26 USC § 3121(d)(2), § 3306(i) of federal Unemployment Tax Act (26 USC § 3306(i)), and implementing regulations, 37 ALR Fed 95.

Representation by attorney of social security benefit claimant in administrative proceeding, 59 ALR Fed 595.

§ 27-3-307.
Eligibility when enrolled in approved training program; standards for training program approval.

Notwithstanding W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i) and (iii) or 27-3-311(a)(ii) and (iii) or any federal law relating to availability for, active search for, failure to apply for or refusal to accept suitable work, an otherwise eligible individual is eligible for benefits for any week if he is:

Enrolled in a training program approved by the department pursuant to subsection (b) of this section; or

In training approved under federal law.

Standards for training program approval under subsection (a) of this section are:

Licensed or accredited by the appropriate agency;

Preparation for job skills for occupations with good employment opportunities;

Individual interest, aptitude and motivation determined necessary by the department to complete the course successfully;

Regular class attendance, satisfactory progress in course work and individual compliance with other training requirements of the institution;

Training is to prepare an individual for entry level or upgraded employment in a recognized skilled vocational or technical occupation and such training is designed to facilitate the learning of particular skills; and

Current skills of the individual are obsolete or offer minimal employment opportunities.

Notwithstanding W.S. 27-3-311(a)(i), an otherwise eligible individual is eligible for benefits in any week if he:

Is in training approved under federal law; or

Left work to enter approved training if the work is not suitable, as defined under federal law.

Notwithstanding W.S. 27-3-306(a)(i) and (iii) or 27-3-311(a)(i) through (iii) or any federal law relating to availability for, active search for, failure to apply for or refusal to accept suitable work, an otherwise eligible individual is eligible for benefits for any week if he is not receiving wages or compensation while participating in training in an apprenticeship program approved by the department if he:

Is attending instruction related to the program when the instruction does not exceed eight (8) weeks during the benefit year of the individual and the attendance in the instruction is required as a condition of the individual’s continued enrollment in the apprenticeship program;

Provides the department with a copy of his apprenticeship agreement;

Files claims in accordance with the rules of the department;

Establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the training is an approved apprenticeship program; and

Has his most recent employer approve his participation in the training.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 4; 1939, ch. 124, § 9; 1941, ch. 96, § 4; 1943, ch. 58, § 4; 1945, ch. 81, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 54-104; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 4; 1953, ch. 111, § 3; 1957, ch. 88, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 27-25; Laws 1963, ch. 121, § 4; 1967, ch. 175, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 11, 12; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-104

; Laws 1980, ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83, § 1; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; 2005, ch. 186, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), substituted “and (iii)” for “(iii) and (iv).”

Requirements. —

District court properly upheld the Unemployment Insurance Commission’s denial of an employee’s request for unemployment benefits because he left work voluntarily after his employer could not accommodate his request for alternate hours or a new position to support his school schedule, and he did not qualify for the exception return “to approved training” where his enrollment in a nursing program absent the required determination did not meet the conditions of the statutory exception. Gerber v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2020 WY 90, 467 P.3d 153,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2020).

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 27-3-308.
Services excluded for eligibility.

An individual is not eligible for benefits based on service:

In an instructional, research or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution for any week of unemployment beginning between two (2) successive academic years, two (2) regular terms whether or not successive or during a paid sabbatical leave and he has a reasonable assurance to perform services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second academic year or term or end of the paid sabbatical leave;

In any other capacity for any educational institution for weeks of unemployment beginning September 3, 1982, and thereafter for any week of unemployment beginning between two (2) successive academic years or terms if he is employed in the first academic year or term with a reasonable assurance for employment in the second year or term for any educational institution. If compensation is denied to any individual under this paragraph and he was not offered an opportunity to perform services for the educational institution for the second academic year or term, the individual is entitled to retroactive payment of compensation for each week he filed a timely claim for compensation but was denied compensation solely because of this paragraph;

For training, preparing and participating in sporting or athletic events for any week of unemployment beginning between two (2) successive seasons or periods if he is employed in the first season or period with reasonable assurance of employment in the second season or period.

With respect to any service described in paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section, benefits are not payable on the basis of services in any such capacities to any individual for any week which commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual performs the services in the period immediately before the vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the services in the period immediately following the vacation period or holiday recess. With respect to any services described in paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section, and in this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any such capacities as specified in paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section, and in this subsection, to any individual who performed the services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency and who has a reasonable assurance of continued employment with an educational service agency. For purposes of this subsection, “educational service agency” means a governmental agency or governmental entity which is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing the services to one (1) or more educational institutions. With respect to services to which W.S. 27-3-105(a)(i) and (ii) applies, if the services are provided to or on behalf of an educational institution, benefits shall not be payable under the same circumstances and subject to the same terms and conditions as described in paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section and this subsection.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 4; 1939, ch. 124, § 9; 1941, ch. 96, § 4; 1943, ch. 58, § 4; 1945, ch. 81, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 54-104; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 4; 1953, ch. 111, § 3; 1957, ch. 88, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 27-25; Laws 1963, ch. 121, § 4; 1967, ch. 175, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 11, 12; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-104

; Laws 1980, ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1986, ch. 56, § 1; 1988, ch. 51, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2.

§ 27-3-309.
Eligibility of aliens; standard of proof required.

Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by an alien unless the alien was lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States at the time the services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing the services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed, pursuant to section 212(d)(5) [8 U.S.C. § 1182(d)(5)] of the Immigration and Nationality Act.

Information necessary to determine alien status for benefit eligibility shall be uniformly required of all benefit applicants. Determination of benefit eligibility under this section shall be by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 4; 1939, ch. 124, § 9; 1941, ch. 96, § 4; 1943, ch. 58, § 4; 1945, ch. 81, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 54-104; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 4; 1953, ch. 111, § 3; 1957, ch. 88, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 27-25; Laws 1963, ch. 121, § 4; 1967, ch. 175, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 11, 12; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-104

; Laws 1980, ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1991, ch. 35, § 1.

§ 27-3-310.
Eligibility after receiving worker's compensation.

Notwithstanding requirements for the base period and other compensation factors provided under this act, an individual receiving compensation under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act [§

27-14-101

et seq.] for a continuous period of sickness or injury resulting in temporary total disability and otherwise eligible for benefits under this article may preserve unused wage credits for the four (4) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the date identified as the date of injury under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act. Benefit rights shall not be preserved unless a benefit claim is filed within sixty (60) calendar days following the date notice is mailed to the claimant that he is no longer eligible to receive temporary total disability benefits pursuant to W.S. 27-14-404(c) and within the thirty-six (36) month period immediately following the date of injury.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 236, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1988, ch. 51, § 1; 1993, ch. 19, § 1; 1995, ch. 13, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.